apertium-ga-gd/apertium-ga-gd.ga-full.dix
    <pardef n="sl/iabh__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>éibhe</l>
          <r>iabh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>éibhte</l>
          <r>iabh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>éibhte</l>
          <r>iabh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iabh</l>
          <r>iabh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pra/p__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ipe</l>
          <r>p<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ip</l>
          <r>p<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pa</l>
          <r>p<s n="adj"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>p</l>
          <r>p<s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Saighdeo/ir__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          <r>ir<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>ir<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="starr__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tha</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="l/eanbh__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eanaí</l>
          <r>eanbh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eanbh</l>
          <r>eanbh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inbh</l>
          <r>eanbh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="naí/on__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>on</l>
          <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>on</l>
          <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="cig/il__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>il</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ilte</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ilte</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ilte</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ilte</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>leofar</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>leoidh</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>leoidh</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>leoidh</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>leoidh</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>leoidh</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>leoimid</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lídís</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lígí</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>límid</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lím</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>límis</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lím</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>líodh</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>líodh</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>líonn</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>líonn</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>líonn</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>líonn</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lítear</l>
          <r>il<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="aut"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="gé/ar__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ara</l>
          <r>ar<s n="adj"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r>ar<s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ire</l>
          <r>ar<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          <r>ar<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="adha/rc__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irce</l>
          <r>rc<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rca</l>
          <r>rc<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rc</l>
          <r>rc<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rc</l>
          <r>rc<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="spe/al__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ala</l>
          <r>al<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>al</l>
          <r>al<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>al</l>
          <r>al<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ile</l>
          <r>al<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="coigil"><i>coig</i><par n="cig/il__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cigil"><i>cig</i><par n="cig/il__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cuimil"><i>cuim</i><par n="cig/il__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="géar"><i>gé</i><par n="gé/ar__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="prap"><i>pra</i><par n="pra/p__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="adharc"><par n="initial-a"/><i>dha</i><par n="adha/rc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="feabhsaitheoir"><par n="initial-f"/><i>eabhsaitheo</i><par n="Saighdeo/ir__n"/></e>
    <e lm="naíon"><i>naí</i><par n="naí/on__n"/></e>
    <e lm="meanmarc"><par n="initial-m"/><i>eanma</i><par n="adha/rc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="leanbh"><i>l</i><par n="l/eanbh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="speal"><par n="initial-s"/><i>pe</i><par n="spe/al__n"/></e>
    <e lm="starr"><par n="initial-s"/><i>tarr</i><par n="starr__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sliabh"><par n="initial-s"/><i>l</i><par n="sl/iabh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="uchtleanbh"><par n="initial-u"/><i>chtl</i><par n="l/eanbh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Áibhirseoir"><i>Áibhirseo</i><par n="Saighdeo/ir__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Moinsíneoir"><i>Moinsíneo</i><par n="Saighdeo/ir__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Saighdeoir"><i>Saighdeo</i><par n="Saighdeo/ir__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Vicífhoclóir"><i>Vicífhocló</i><par n="Saighdeo/ir__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Uisceadóir"><i>Uisceadó</i><par n="Saighdeo/ir__n"/></e>
